Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 1.1 Office of Management and Budget

35-1.1-1.
Statement of intent.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a comprehensive public finance and management system for the State of Rhode Island that manages a data-driven budget process; monitors state departments’ and agencies’ performance; improves the regulatory climate; and ensures accountability and transparency regarding the use of public funds and regulatory impact.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 9.

35-1.1-2.
Establishment of the office of management and budget.

There is hereby established within the department of administration an office of management and budget. This office shall serve as the principal agency of the executive branch of state government for managing budgetary functions, regulatory review, performance management, internal audit, and federal grants management. In this capacity, the office shall:

Establish an in-depth form of data analysis within and between departments and agencies, creating a more informed process for resource allocation to best meet the needs of Rhode Island citizens;

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 9];

Analyze the impact of proposed regulations on the public and state as required by chapters 64.13 and 35 of title 42;

Analyze federal budgetary issues and report on potential impacts to the state;

Coordinate the budget functions of the state with performance management objectives;

Maximize efficiencies in departments, agencies, advisory councils, and instrumentalities of the state by improving processes and prioritizing programs;

Be responsible for the internal audit function of state government and conduct audits of any state department, state agency, or private entity that is a recipient of state funding or state grants; provide management advisory and consulting services; or conduct investigations relative to the financial affairs or the efficiency of management, or both, of any state department or agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 7; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 9.

35-1.1-3.
Director of management and budget — Appointment and responsibilities.

Within the department of administration there shall be a director of management and budget who shall be appointed by the director of administration with the approval of the governor. The director shall be responsible to the governor and director of administration for supervising the office of management and budget and for managing and providing strategic leadership and direction to the budget officer, the performance management office, and the federal grants management office.

The director of management and budget shall be responsible to:

Oversee, coordinate, and manage the functions of the budget officer as set forth by chapter 3 of this title; program performance management as set forth by §

35-3-24.1

; approval of agreements with federal agencies defined by §

35-3-25

; and budgeting, appropriation, and receipt of federal monies as set forth by chapter 41 of title 42;

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 9];

Oversee the director of regulatory reform as set forth by §

42-64.13-6

;

Maximize the indirect cost recoveries by state agencies set forth by §

35-4-23.1

; and

Undertake a comprehensive review and inventory of all reports filed by the executive office and agencies of the state with the general assembly. The inventory should include, but not be limited to: the type, title, and summary of reports; the author(s) of the reports; the specific audience of the reports; and a schedule of the reports’ release. The inventory shall be presented to the general assembly as part of the budget submission on a yearly basis. The office of management and budget shall also make recommendations to consolidate, modernize the reports, and to make recommendations for elimination or expansion of each report.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 2013, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 54; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 9.

35-1.1-4.
Offices and functions assigned to the office of management and budget — Powers and duties.

The offices assigned to the office of management and budget include the budget office, the office of regulatory reform, the performance management office, and the office of internal audit.

The offices assigned to the office of management and budget shall:

Exercise their respective powers and duties in accordance with their statutory authority and the general policy established by the governor or by the director acting on behalf of the governor or in accordance with the powers and authorities conferred upon the director by this chapter;

Provide such assistance or resources as may be requested or required by the governor and/or the director;

Provide such records and information as may be requested or required by the governor and/or the director, to the extent allowed under the provisions of any applicable general or public law, regulation, or agreement relating to the confidentiality, privacy, or disclosure of such records or information; and

Except as provided herein, no provision of this chapter or application thereof shall be construed to limit or otherwise restrict the budget officer from fulfilling any statutory requirement or complying with any valid rule or regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 7; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 9.

35-1.1-5.
Federal grants management.

The controller shall be responsible for managing federal grant applications; providing administrative assistance to agencies regarding reporting requirements; providing technical assistance; and approving agreements with federal agencies pursuant to §

35-1-1

. The controller shall:

Establish state goals and objectives for maximizing the utilization of federal aid programs;

Ensure that the state establishes and maintains statewide federally mandated grants management processes and procedures as mandated by the federal Office of Management and Budget;

Promulgate procedures and guidelines for all state departments, agencies, advisory councils, instrumentalities of the state, and public higher education institutions covering applications for federal grants;

Require, upon request, any state department, agency, advisory council, instrumentality of the state, or public higher education institution receiving a grant of money from the federal government to submit a report to the controller of expenditures and program measures for the fiscal period in question;

Ensure state departments and agencies adhere to the requirements of §

42-41-5

regarding legislative appropriation authority and delegation thereof;

Manage and oversee the disbursements of federal funds in accordance with §

35-6-42

;

Prepare the statewide cost allocation plan and serve as the monitoring agency to ensure that state departments and agencies are working within the guidelines contained in the plan; and

Provide technical assistance to agencies to ensure resolution and closure of all single state audit findings and recommendations made by the auditor general related to federal funding.

The division of accounts and control shall serve as the state clearinghouse for purposes of coordinating federal grants, aid, and assistance applied for and/or received by any state department, agency, advisory council, or instrumentality of the state. Any state department, agency, advisory council, or instrumentality of the state applying for federal funds, aids, loans, or grants shall file a summary notification of the intended application with the controller.

When as a condition to receiving federal funds, the state is required to match the federal funds, a statement shall be filed with the notice of intent or summary of the application stating:

The amount and source of state funds needed for matching purposes;

The length of time the matching funds shall be required;

The growth of the program;

How the program will be evaluated;

What action will be necessary should the federal funds be canceled, curtailed, or restricted; and

Any other financial and program management data required by the office or by law.

Except as otherwise required, any application submitted by an executive agency for federal funds, aids, loans, or grants which will require state matching or replacement funds at the time of application or at any time in the future, must be approved by the director of the office of management and budget, or his or her designated agents, prior to its filing with the appropriate federal agency. Any application submitted by an executive agency for federal funds, aids, loans, or grants which will require state matching or replacement funds at the time of application or at any time in the future, when funds have not been appropriated for that express purpose, must be approved by the general assembly in accordance with §

42-41-5

. When the general assembly is not in session, the application shall be reported to and reviewed by the director pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the director.

When any federal funds, aids, loans, or grants are received by any state department, agency, advisory council, or instrumentality of the state, a report of the amount of funds received shall be filed with the office; and this report shall specify the amount of funds that would reimburse an agency for indirect costs, as provided for under federal requirements.

The controller may refuse to issue approval for the disbursement of any state or federal funds from the state treasury as the result of any application that is not approved as provided by this section, or in regard to which the statement or reports required by this section were not filed.

The controller shall be responsible for the orderly administration of this section and for issuing the appropriate guidelines and regulations from each source of funds used.

There is hereby created in the general fund and housed within the budget of the department of administration a restricted receipt account entitled “Grants Management Administration.” This account shall be used to fund centralized services relating to managing federal grant applications; providing administrative assistance to agencies regarding reporting requirements; providing technical assistance; approving agreements with federal agencies pursuant to §

35-1-1

; and, may include costs associated with the development, implementation, and ongoing operation of a grants management information technology system. Every state department and agency, as defined in §

35-1-4

, that receives federal assistance funds, excluding awards made directly to Rhode Island College, the Community College of Rhode Island, and the University of Rhode Island, shall set aside an amount of the funds received equal to a percentage as determined annually by the state controller multiplied by federal funds received. The state controller shall determine this rate annually in proportion with budgeted expenditures for uses consistent with the purpose of this subsection within the department of administration.

For federal awards in response to the COVID-19 pandemic and subsequent stimulus awards, there is hereby authorized an additional assessment that shall be deposited into the restricted receipt account established by this subsection and shall be equal to a uniform percentage of the amount of stimulus and other awards received, excluding Medicaid and all awards made directly to Rhode Island College, the Community College of Rhode Island, and the University of Rhode Island, associated with the COVID-19 pandemic and subsequent stimulus acts. The state controller shall calculate the rate of this additional assessment, not to exceed one percent (1%) of the total awards received during a fiscal year, in proportion with budgeted expenditures necessary to finance the planning, oversight, compliance, and reporting functions within the department of administration related to federal awards issued in response to the pandemic and subsequent stimulus awards in addition to the costs of planning, development, and implementation of a grants management information technology system. The Grants Management Administration account shall not include an allocation of the State Fiscal Recovery Fund or the Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund. For the additional assessment related to federal awards issued in response to the pandemic and subsequent stimulus awards no funds shall be deposited into the restricted receipt account after December 31, 2026, the federally determined end of performance period. All funds set aside and designated to be used for grants management shall be deposited into the restricted receipt account established in this subsection.

Prior to any deposits being made into the restricted receipt account established by this subsection and thereafter prior to the commencement of each fiscal year, the state controller shall provide a report to the director of administration and the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees that includes the rate and calculation thereof for the following fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 9; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 3, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 2, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

35-1.1-6.
Office of management and budget expenses.

There is created a restricted receipt account for the office of management and budget to be known as OMB administrative expense account. Payments from the account shall be limited to expenses for administrative oversight and management of federal and state funds received by the state agencies.

All amounts deposited in the office of management and budget accounts shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of §

35-4-27

.

The office of management and budget is authorized to receive indirect costs on federal funds to cover oversight expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5.

35-1.1-7.
Appointment of employees.

The director of administration, subject to the provisions of applicable state law, shall be the appointing authority for all employees of the office of management and budget. The director of administration may delegate this function to such subordinate officers and employees of the office as may to him or her seem feasible or desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5.

35-1.1-8.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or sums, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of the office of management and budget, or his or her designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5.

35-1.1-9.
Cooperation of other state executive branch agencies.

The departments and other agencies of the state of the executive branch that have not been assigned to the executive office of management and budget under this chapter shall assist and cooperate with the executive office as may be required by the governor and/or requested by the director of management and budget, this assistance may include, but not be limited to, utilizing staff resources from other departments or agencies for special projects within a defined period of time to improve processes within agencies and/or lead to cost savings.

Within thirty (30) days following the date of the issuance of a final audit report completed pursuant to subdivision

35-1.1-2(6)

, the head of the department, agency or private entity audited shall respond in writing to each recommendation made in the final audit report. This response shall address the department’s, agency’s or private entity’s plan of implementation for each specific audit recommendation and, if applicable, the reasons for disagreement with any recommendation proposed in the audit report. Within one year following the date on which the audit report was issued, the office may perform a follow-up audit for the purpose of determining whether the department, agency or private entity has implemented, in an efficient and effective manner, its plan of action for the recommendations proposed in the audit report.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5.

35-1.1-10.
Organizational reviews and special initiatives.

The director of the office of management and budget is hereby directed to conduct research and analysis to study the programs of the department of transportation and other quasi-transportation related agencies not limited to bridge, vehicle and winter maintenance efficiencies and effectiveness. The director of the office of management and budget is authorized to consult with the appropriate federal agencies and departments that provide funds to, or delegate authority to, the state department of transportation and other quasi-transportation related agencies.

This plan shall address the goal of improving efficiency of transportation programs; identifying similar programs that are being performed.

The office of management and budget is directed to report findings, recommendations, and alternative designs to the governor and general assembly no later than November 1, 2012, with copies to the governor, speaker of the house, senate president, chairs of the house and senate finance committees and their respective fiscal advisors.

The report shall include a strategic plan that outlines the mission, goals, the estimated cost and timelines to implement said recommendations, and the federal and state mandates associated with the current programs. The report shall provide a clear definition of roles and responsibilities, including those responsible for implementing the proposed recommendations. The analysis shall develop outcome measures and an appropriate timeline to measure implementation progress. It shall also include:

An examination of the various organizational structures in other states, evaluating their strengths and weaknesses, and how they may or may not be applicable in Rhode Island. This should include an evaluation of the best practices regarding efficiencies.

An analysis of what programs and responsibilities could be more efficiently implemented and managed. This should include, but not be limited to, strategies to reorganize and or centralize transportation programs.

An evaluation of the federal, state and other revenues that support these programs, and the impacts on revenues and expenses associated with the alternatives and recommendations.

The department of transportation and other quasi-transportation related agencies shall furnish such advice and information, documentary or otherwise, to the director of the office of management and budget as is deemed necessary or desirable to facilitate the purposes of the study.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5.

35-1.1-11.
Rules and regulations.

The office of management and budget shall be deemed an agency for purposes of §

42-35-1

et seq. The director shall make and promulgate such rules and regulations, and establish fee schedules not inconsistent with state law and fiscal policies and procedures as he or she deems necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and to carry out the policy and purposes thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5.

35-1.1-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 5.